Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
145D]

DONATION
OF FOOD

Section

145D-1 Definitions

145D-2 Exceptions to liability

145D-3 Sale of donated food, prohibited; fines

145D-4 Labeling of donated food

145D-5 Reserving the State's authority to
regulate, inspect,

or ban the use of donated food

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next